fst/morphology/stems/morph_derivation.lexc
LEXICON MorphemicDerivation
0 Initials ;

LEXICON (a)cikâs-
(a)cikâs-/:acikâs/ -min "weight: 29.315926" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
(a)cikâs-/:cikâs/ -min "weight: 29.315926" ; ! n=1/2 [0/145429]
(a)cikâs-/:acikâs/ -pakw "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/2 [3/145429]
(a)cikâs-/:cikâs/ -pakw "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/2 [3/145429]

LEXICON (a)yâkwâm-
(a)yâkwâm-/:ayâkwâm/ -isi "weight: 28.335097" ; ! n=4/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:yâkwâm/ -isi "weight: 28.335097" ; ! n=4/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:ayâkwâm/ -m1 "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/14 [2/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:yâkwâm/ -m1 "weight: 20.255014" ; ! n=3/14 [2/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:ayâkwâm/ -êýi- "weight: 28.622779" ; ! n=3/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:yâkwâm/ -êýi- "weight: 28.622779" ; ! n=3/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:ayâkwâm/ -êýiht "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:yâkwâm/ -êýiht "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=2/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:ayâkwâm/ -êýim "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:yâkwâm/ -êýim "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:ayâkwâm/ -î1 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/14 [0/145429]
(a)yâkwâm-/:yâkwâm/ -î1 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/14 [0/145429]

LEXICON (k)askatêw-
(k)askatêw-/:kaskatêw/ -ê2 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]
(k)askatêw-/:askatêw/ -ê2 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]

LEXICON (ka)kayês-
(ka)kayês-/:kakayês/ -iýaw1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]
(ka)kayês-/:kayês/ -iýaw1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON (ka)kwêt-
(ka)kwêt-/:kakwêt/ -m1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]
(ka)kwêt-/:kwêt/ -m1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]

LEXICON (ki)cîsk-
(ki)cîsk-/:kicîsk/ -ht1 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
(ki)cîsk-/:cîsk/ -ht1 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
(ki)cîsk-/:kicîsk/ -htâkwan "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
(ki)cîsk-/:cîsk/ -htâkwan "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=1/3 [0/145429]
(ki)cîsk-/:kicîsk/ -âpit- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/3 [1/145429]
(ki)cîsk-/:cîsk/ -âpit- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/3 [1/145429]

LEXICON (kî)kisêp-
(kî)kisêp-/:kîkisêp/ -âyâ "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]
(kî)kisêp-/:kisêp/ -âyâ "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON (m)ahkê-
(m)ahkê-/:mahkê/ -isiw "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]
(m)ahkê-/:ahkê/ -isiw "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON (na)ma
(na)ma/:nama/ ihtakw- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]
(na)ma/:ma/ ihtakw- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON (na)nam-
(na)nam-/:nanam/ -paýi "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=3/6 [3/145429]
(na)nam-/:nam/ -paýi "weight: 19.849549" ; ! n=3/6 [3/145429]
(na)nam-/:nanam/ -paýiho "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/6 [1/145429]
(na)nam-/:nam/ -paýiho "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/6 [1/145429]
(na)nam-/:nanam/ -skw1- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/6 [1/145429]
(na)nam-/:nam/ -skw1- "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/6 [1/145429]

LEXICON (o)t-
(o)t-/:ot/ ihkw- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]
(o)t-/:t/ ihkw- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON (o)w-
(o)w-/:ow/ -iyaw- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]
(o)w-/:w/ -iyaw- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/1 [0/145429]

LEXICON (pa)pak-
(pa)pak-/:papak/ -wayân "weight: 30.009073" ; ! n=3/4 [0/145429]
(pa)pak-/:pak/ -wayân "weight: 30.009073" ; ! n=3/4 [0/145429]
(pa)pak-/:papak/ -wayân- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/4 [0/145429]
(pa)pak-/:pak/ -wayân- "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/4 [0/145429]

LEXICON (w)âpakw-
(w)âpakw-/:wâpakw/ -isiw "weight: 16.971600" ; ! n=8/8 [20/145429]
(w)âpakw-/:âpakw/ -isiw "weight: 16.971600" ; ! n=8/8 [20/145429]

LEXICON (w)ât-
(w)ât-/:wât/ -ihk- "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=4/8 [0/145429]
(w)ât-/:ât/ -ihk- "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=4/8 [0/145429]
(w)ât-/:wât/ -ihkâT "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
(w)ât-/:ât/ -ihkâT "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
(w)ât-/:wât/ -ihkât "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/8 [0/145429]
(w)ât-/:ât/ -ihkât "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/8 [0/145429]
(w)ât-/:wât/ -ihkê "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]
(w)ât-/:ât/ -ihkê "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/8 [0/145429]

LEXICON (w)îcêw-
(w)îcêw-/:wîcêw/ -âkan1 "weight: 19.744189" ; ! n=1/1 [10/145429]
(w)îcêw-/:îcêw/ -âkan1 "weight: 19.744189" ; ! n=1/1 [10/145429]

LEXICON (w)îkim-
(w)îkim-/:wîkim/ -âkan1 "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/1 [3/145429]
(w)îkim-/:îkim/ -âkan1 "weight: 20.948162" ; ! n=1/1 [3/145429]

LEXICON (wa)wiyaT-
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -ht1 "weight: 27.418806" ; ! n=5/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -ht1 "weight: 27.418806" ; ! n=5/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -htaw "weight: 28.335097" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -htaw "weight: 28.335097" ; ! n=2/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -htâkosi "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -htâkosi "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -htâkwan "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -htâkwan "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -naw "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/24 [1/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -naw "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/24 [1/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -nâkosi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/24 [1/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -nâkosi "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/24 [1/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -nâkwan "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -nâkwan "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -wê "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -wê "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -êýi- "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=5/24 [1/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -êýi- "weight: 20.437336" ; ! n=5/24 [1/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -êýiht "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/24 [1/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -êýiht "weight: 21.353627" ; ! n=2/24 [1/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -êýihtâkosi "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -êýihtâkosi "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -êýihtâkwan "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -êýihtâkwan "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wawiyaT/ -êýim "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]
(wa)wiyaT-/:wiyaT/ -êýim "weight: 29.028244" ; ! n=1/24 [0/145429]

LEXICON (wâ)pakosîs-
(wâ)pakosîs-+Der/N:wâpakosîs NA "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-1) [1/145429]
(wâ)pakosîs-+Der/N:pakosîs NA "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 (NA-1) [1/145429]

LEXICON (wâ)pakw-
(wâ)pakw-/:wâpakw/ -isiw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]
(wâ)pakw-/:pakw/ -isiw "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]

LEXICON (y)ihk-
(y)ihk-/:yihk/ -ah1 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
(y)ihk-/:ihk/ -ah1 "weight: 30.414539" ; ! n=2/5 [0/145429]
(y)ihk-/:yihk/ -ahw1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
(y)ihk-/:ihk/ -ahw1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
(y)ihk-/:yihk/ -n1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
(y)ihk-/:ihk/ -n1 "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
(y)ihk-/:yihk/ -pê "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]
(y)ihk-/:ihk/ -pê "weight: 31.107686" ; ! n=1/5 [0/145429]

LEXICON (â)cik-
(â)cik-/:âcik/ -âstê1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]
(â)cik-/:cik/ -âstê1 "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/1 [1/145429]

LEXICON (ý)âs-
(ý)âs-/:ýâs/ -ciw- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/6 [1/145429]
(ý)âs-/:âs/ -ciw- "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/6 [1/145429]
(ý)âs-/:ýâs/ -ciwan "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/6 [1/145429]
(ý)âs-/:âs/ -ciwan "weight: 22.046774" ; ! n=1/6 [1/145429]
(ý)âs-/:ýâs/ -paýin "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
(ý)âs-/:âs/ -paýin "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
(ý)âs-/:ýâs/ -piT "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
(ý)âs-/:âs/ -piT "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
(ý)âs-/:ýâs/ -pit "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
(ý)âs-/:âs/ -pit "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
(ý)âs-/:ýâs/ -î1 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]
(ý)âs-/:âs/ -î1 "weight: 29.721391" ; ! n=1/6 [0/145429]

LEXICON Initials
0 (a)cikâs- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [3/145429]
0 (a)yâkwâm- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=11/27654 [2/145429]
0 (ka)kayês- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 (ka)kwêt- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [1/145429]
0 (ki)cîsk- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=2/27654 [1/145429]
0 (kî)kisêp- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 (na)ma "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 (na)nam- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=5/27654 [4/145429]
0 (o)t- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 (o)w- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [0/145429]
0 (pa)pak- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=3/27654 [0/145429]
0 (w)âpakw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=8/27654 [20/145429]
0 (w)îcêw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [10/145429]
0 (w)îkim- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [3/145429]
0 (wa)wiyaT- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=13/27654 [2/145429]
0 (wâ)pakosîs- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [1/145429]
0 (wâ)pakw- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [1/145429]
0 (y)ihk- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=5/27654 [0/145429]
0 (â)cik- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=1/27654 [1/145429]
0 (ý)âs- "weight: 0.000000" ; ! n=5/27654 [1/145429]
